Massachusetts, session 194th, H3835.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
“Reserve veteran”, shall mean a person (a) whose last discharge from the National Guard 
or Reserve was under honorable conditions; and (b) who performed at least 20 years of service as 
computed under 10 U.S.C. section 12732; provided, however, that a reserve veteran shall not be 
considered a veteran for the purposes of this clause solely by reason of satisfying this definition. 
SECTION 2.  Chapter 115 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 

of 2 9  Section 16.  Reserve veterans shall be honored and recognized as veterans in the 
commonwealth; provided, however that a reserve veteran shall not be eligible for benefits 
administered under this chapter or any other general or special law solely by reason of being a 
reserve veteran.  
The commissioner shall develop a program for outreach to reserve veterans in order to 
effectively recognize their service and further their inclusion in all honorary and ceremonial 
events for veterans throughout the commonwealth.